hr-HR: Vrsta valute: Novčanice; Kovanice; Tokeni; Ostalo
sl-SI: Vrsta valute: Bankovci; Kovanci; Žetoni; Drugo
nb: Valutatype: Sedler; Mynter; Tokens; Annet
it: Tipo di valuta: Fatture; Monete; Token; Altro
ko: 통화 유형: 지폐; 동전; 토큰; 기타
ja: 通貨の種類: 紙幣; コイン; トークン; その他
es: Tipo de moneda: Billetes; Monedas; Token; Otros
fr: Type de devise: Billets; Pièces de monnaie; Jetons; Autre
ru: Тип валюты: Купюры; Монеты; Жетоны; Другое
ro-RO: Tip monedă: Facturi; Monede; Tokenuri; Altele
el: Τύπος νομίσματος: Χαρτονομίσματα; Νομίσματα; Μάρκες; Άλλο
vi: Loại tiền: Tiền giấy; Đồng xu; Token; Khác
da: Valutatype: Sedler; Mønter; Tokens; Andet
sk-SK: Typ meny: Bankovky; Mince; Tokeny; Iné
hu: Pénznem típusa: Bankjegy; Aprópénz; Zseton; Egyéb
nl: Valutatype: Biljetten; Munten; Tokens; Andere
lt-LT: Valiutos tipas: Banknotai; Monetos; Žetonai; Kita
pt-BR: Tipo de moeda: Notas; Moedas; Tokens; Outro
th: ประเภทสกุลเงิน: ธนบัตร; เหรียญ; โทเค็น; อื่นๆ
fi: Valuuttatyyppi: Setelit; Kolikot; Tokenit; Muu
zh-CN: 货币类型: 钞票; 硬币; 代币; 其他
zh-TW: 幣別: 帳單; 硬幣; 代幣; 其他
tr: Para Birimi Türü: Faturalar; Paralar; Token'lar; Diğer
sv: Valutatyp: Räkningar; Mynt; Polletter; Övrigt
pt-PT: Tipo de moeda: Notas; Moedas; Tokens; Outro
en: Currency type: Bills; Coins; Tokens; Other
de: Währungstyp: Geldschein; Münzen; Token; Sonstiges
cs: Typ měny: Bankovky; Mince; Tokeny; Jiné
bg-BG: Тип валута: Банкноти; Монети; Токени; Други
pl: Typ waluty: Banknoty; Monety; Tokeny; Inne